Washington statutes.
RCW 36.150.020

Initiation of county assumption.

The assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a county ferry district may be initiated by the adoption of an ordinance or a resolution by the county legislative authority indicating its intention to conduct a hearing concerning the assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations. If the county legislative authority adopts such an ordinance or a resolution of intention, the ordinance or resolution must set a time and place at which the county legislative authority will consider the proposed assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the county ferry district, and must state that all persons interested may appear and be heard. The ordinance or resolution of intention must be published at least two times during the two weeks preceding the scheduled hearing in newspapers of daily general circulation printed or published in the county in which the county ferry district is to be located.

[ 2014 c 51 s 2.]